nl: Geschikt voor stoeltype: Bank; Kamperen; Sofa; Spa; Ontlasting; Universeel; Andere
zh-TW: 適合椅子: 長椅; 露營; 沙發; Spa; 糞便; 通用; 其他
de: Eignung für Stuhltyp: Bank; Camping; Sofa; Spa; Stuhl; Universell; Sonstiges
cs: Vhodný typ sedacího nábytku: Lavice; Kempování; Gauč; Lázně; Stolice; Univerzální; Jiné
zh-CN: 适合椅型: 长椅; 野营; 沙发; 温泉; 大便; 通用; 其他
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทของเก้าอี้: ม้านั่ง; การตั้งแคมป์; โซฟา; สปา; สตูล; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο καρέκλας: Πάγκος; Κατασκήνωση; Καναπές; Ιαματική πηγή; Σκαμπό; Universal; Άλλο
sv: Lämplig för stoltyp: Bänk; Camping; Soffa; Spa; Avföring; Universell; Övrigt
ru: Для какого типа стула: Лавка; Кемпинг; Диван; Спа; Табурет; Универсальный; Другое
vi: Phù hợp với loại ghế: Ghế dài; Cắm trại; Ghế sofa; Spa; Phân; Phổ biến; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta stolice za koju je prikladno: Klupa; Kampiranje; Kauč; Spa; Stolčić; Univerzalno; Ostalo
ja: 椅子のタイプに適している: ベンチ; キャンプ; ソファ; スパ; 排便; ユニバーサル; その他
tr: Sandalye türüne uygun: Bank; Kampçılık; Kanepe; Spa; Dışkı; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de cadeira: Banco; Acampamento; Sofá; Spa; Amostra de fezes; Universal; Outro
nb: Egnet for stoltype: Benk; Camping; Sofa; Spa; Avføring; Universal; Annet
pl: Typ odpowiedni dla fotela: Stanowisko testowe; Kemping; Sofa; Spa; Stolec; Uniwersalny; Inne
fr: Convient au type de chaise: Banc; Camping; Canapé; Spa; Selles; Universel; Autre
pt-PT: Adequado para o tipo de cadeira: Banco; Campismo; Sofá; Spa; Fezes; Universal; Outro
fi: Soveltuu tuolityypille: Penkki; Telttailu; Sohva; Kylpylä; Uloste; Yleinen; Muu
it: Tipo di sedia ideale: Panca; Campeggio; Divano; Spa; Sgabello; Universale; Altro
lt-LT: Tinka kėdžių tipui: Suoliukas; Sulankstoma kėdė; Sofa; Spa; Taburetė; Universalus; Kita
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ stoličky: Lavička; Kempovanie; Pohovka; Kúpele; Stolička; Univerzálny; Iné
hu: Széktípus: Pad; Kemping; Kanapé; Gyógyfürdő; Ülőke; Univerzális; Egyéb
da: Velegnet til stoletype: Bænk; Camping; Sofa; Spa; Afføring; Universal; Andet
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип стол: Пейка; Къмпинг; Диван; Спа; Стол; Универсален; Други
ko: 의자 유형에 적합: 벤치; 캠핑; 소파; 스파; 대변; 범용; 기타
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de scaun: Bancă; Camping; Canapea; Spa; Taburet; Universal; Altele
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto stola: Klop; Kampiranje; Kavč; Pedikurni; Stolček; Univerzalno; Drugo
en: Suitable for chair type: Bench; Camping; Sofa; Spa; Stool; Universal; Other
es: Adecuado para tipo de silla: Banco; Camping; Sofá; Spa; Taburete; Universal; Otros